Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-221
School lands; acquisition for public highway.

The Department of Roads of the State of Nebraska and the county board of any county may acquire land necessary to establish a public highway over or across any educational lands.

Laws 1907, c. 134, § 1, p. 437;

Laws 1913, c. 40, § 1, p. 135;

R.S.1913, § 5855;

Laws 1915, c. 103, § 1, p. 247;

Laws 1921, c. 80, § 2, p. 290;

C.S.1922, § 5191;

Laws 1923, c. 61, § 1, p. 185;

Laws 1925, c. 135, § 1, p. 354;

Laws 1929, c. 188, § 1, p. 652;

C.S.1929, § 72-211;

Laws 1931, c. 118, § 1, p. 345;

Laws 1935, c. 164, § 1, p. 611;

Laws 1941, c. 145, § 1, p. 576;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-211;

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 1, p. 574;

R.S.1943, § 72-221.